District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-4508

Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-200, § 2, 30 DCR 125
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(c), 48 DCR 2214

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-4508.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act.